Mississippi, session 2026, SB2549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 41-58-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-58-7.  (1)  The State Board of Medical Licensure shall license and regulate the practice of radiologist assistants in accordance with the provisions of this section. (2)  A radiologist may use the services of a radiologist assistant to practice radiology assistance under the supervision of the radiologist, provided that the radiologist assistant is duly qualified and licensed as provided in this section. (3)  The board shall promulgate and publish reasonable rules and regulations necessary to enable it to discharge its functions and enforce the provisions of law regulating the practice of radiologist assistants.  Those rules and regulations shall include, but are not limited to:  qualifications for licensure for radiologist assistants, including, but not limited to, graduation from a radiologist assistant education program accredited by the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists (ARRT) or a radiology practitioner assistant school with a radiologist assistant certification from ARRT, passage of the radiologist assistant examination provided by ARRT, and current and unencumbered registration as a radiologic technologist with the Mississippi State Department of Health; scope of practice of radiologist assistants; supervision of radiologist assistants; identification of radiologist assistants; grounds for disciplinary actions and discipline of radiologist assistants; and setting and charging reasonable fees for licensure and license renewals for radiologist assistants. (4)  Those rules and regulations adopted by the board pertaining to the scope of practice and the educational qualifications necessary to practice as a radiologist assistant shall be consistent with guidelines adopted by the American College of Radiology, the American Society of Radiologic Technologists, and the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists. (5)  Applicants for licensure as a radiologist assistant must be:  (a) credentialed to provide radiology services under the supervision of a radiologist; (b) a radiologic technologist registered under Sections 41-58-1 through 41-58-5; and (c) certified and registered with the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists. (6)  Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a radiologist assistant may not interpret images, make diagnoses or prescribe medications or therapies.  A radiologist assistant may communicate a preliminary image interpretation report with initial observations to other care providers treating a patient, provided the report is clearly labeled as preliminary; however, a radiologist shall provide final image interpretation.  A radiologist assistant may also communicate a radiologist's preliminary or final image interpretation to other care providers. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.